Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201460-4,116
Applicant; department;
duties.

Prior to the issuance of any original or renewal
operator's license, the issuance of a replacement operator's license, or the reissuance
of any such license with a change of any classification, endorsement, or restriction,
the department shall:

(1) Check the driving record of the applicant as maintained by the department
or by any other state which has issued an operator's license to the applicant;

(2) Contact the Commercial Driver License Information System to determine
whether the applicant possesses any valid commercial
learner's permit or commercial driver's license issued by any
other state, whether such license or the applicant's privilege to operate
a commercial motor vehicle has been suspended, revoked, or canceled, or whether
the applicant has been disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle;
and

(3) Contact the National Driver Register to determine if the applicant
(a) has been disqualified from operating any motor vehicle, (b) has had an
operator's license suspended, revoked, or canceled, (c) is not eligible, or
(d) is deceased.

Laws 2003, LB 562, § 6;

Laws 2011, LB178, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB751, § 24;

Laws 2014, LB777, § 5;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 18.
The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-769 correlated LB777, section 5, with LB983, section 18, to reflect all amendments.Changes made by LB777 became effective July 18, 2014. Changes made by LB983 became operative July 8, 2015.